Illinois, session 104th, SB1569.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Sections 401 and 402 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 570/401)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1401)7    Sec. 401. Manufacture or delivery, or possession with 8intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance, a 9counterfeit substance, or controlled substance analog. Except 10as authorized by this Act, it is unlawful for any person 11knowingly to manufacture or deliver, or possess with intent to 12manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance other than 13methamphetamine and other than bath salts as defined in the 14Bath Salts Prohibition Act sold or offered for sale in a retail 15mercantile establishment as defined in Section 16-0.1 of the 16Criminal Code of 2012, a counterfeit substance, or a 17controlled substance analog. A violation of this Act with 18respect to each of the controlled substances listed herein 19constitutes a single and separate violation of this Act. For 20purposes of this Section, "controlled substance analog" or 21"analog" means a substance, other than a controlled substance, 22which is not approved by the United States Food and Drug 23Administration or, if approved, is not dispensed or possessed   SB1569- 2 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1in accordance with State or federal law, and that has a 2chemical structure substantially similar to that of a 3controlled substance in Schedule I or II, or that was 4specifically designed to produce an effect substantially 5similar to that of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II. 6Examples of chemical classes in which controlled substance 7analogs are found include, but are not limited to, the 8following: phenethylamines, N-substituted piperidines, 9morphinans, ecgonines, quinazolinones, substituted indoles, 10and arylcycloalkylamines. For purposes of this Act, a 11controlled substance analog shall be treated in the same 12manner as the controlled substance to which it is 13substantially similar.14    (a) Any person who violates this Section with respect to 15the following amounts of controlled or counterfeit substances 16or controlled substance analogs, notwithstanding any of the 17provisions of subsections (c), (d), (e), (f), (g) or (h) to the 18contrary, is guilty of a Class X felony and shall be sentenced 19to a term of imprisonment as provided in this subsection (a) 20and fined as provided in subsection (b):21        (1)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 22    with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 100 grams of 23    a substance containing heroin, or an analog thereof;24        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 25    with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 400 grams 26    of a substance containing heroin, or an analog thereof;  SB1569- 3 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 2    with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 900 grams 3    of a substance containing heroin, or an analog thereof;4        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 5    with respect to 900 grams or more of any substance 6    containing heroin, or an analog thereof;7        (1.5)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 8    years with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 100 9    grams of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog 10    thereof;11        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 12    with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 400 grams 13    of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog thereof;14        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 15    with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 900 grams 16    of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog thereof;17        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 18    with respect to 900 grams or more of a substance 19    containing fentanyl, or an analog thereof;20        (2)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 21    with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 100 grams of 22    a substance containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;23        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 24    with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 400 grams 25    of a substance containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;26        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years   SB1569- 4 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1    with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 900 grams 2    of a substance containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;3        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 4    with respect to 900 grams or more of any substance 5    containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;6        (3)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 7    with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 100 grams of 8    a substance containing morphine, or an analog thereof;9        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 10    with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 400 grams 11    of a substance containing morphine, or an analog thereof;12        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 13    with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 900 grams 14    of a substance containing morphine, or an analog thereof;15        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 16    with respect to 900 grams or more of a substance 17    containing morphine, or an analog thereof;18        (4) 200 grams or more of any substance containing 19    peyote, or an analog thereof;20        (5) 200 grams or more of any substance containing a 21    derivative of barbituric acid or any of the salts of a 22    derivative of barbituric acid, or an analog thereof;23        (6) 200 grams or more of any substance containing 24    amphetamine or any salt of an optical isomer of 25    amphetamine, or an analog thereof;26        (6.5) (blank);  SB1569- 5 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1        (6.6) (blank);2        (7)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 3    with respect to: (i) 15 grams or more but less than 100 4    grams of a substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 5    (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 15 or more objects or 6    15 or more segregated parts of an object or objects but 7    less than 200 objects or 200 segregated parts of an object 8    or objects containing in them or having upon them any 9    amounts of any substance containing lysergic acid 10    diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof;11        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 12    with respect to: (i) 100 grams or more but less than 400 13    grams of a substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 14    (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 200 or more objects or 15    200 or more segregated parts of an object or objects but 16    less than 600 objects or less than 600 segregated parts of 17    an object or objects containing in them or having upon 18    them any amount of any substance containing lysergic acid 19    diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof;20        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 21    with respect to: (i) 400 grams or more but less than 900 22    grams of a substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 23    (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 600 or more objects or 24    600 or more segregated parts of an object or objects but 25    less than 1500 objects or 1500 segregated parts of an 26    object or objects containing in them or having upon them   SB1569- 6 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1    any amount of any substance containing lysergic acid 2    diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof;3        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 4    with respect to: (i) 900 grams or more of any substance 5    containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or an analog 6    thereof, or (ii) 1500 or more objects or 1500 or more 7    segregated parts of an object or objects containing in 8    them or having upon them any amount of a substance 9    containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or an analog 10    thereof;11    (7.5)(A) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 years 12    with respect to: (i) 15 grams or more but less than 100 13    grams of a substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), 14    (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or 15    (26) of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 16    derivative thereof, or (ii) 15 or more pills, tablets, 17    caplets, capsules, or objects but less than 200 pills, 18    tablets, caplets, capsules, or objects containing in them 19    or having upon them any amounts of any substance listed in 20    paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 21    (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of Section 22    204, or an analog or derivative thereof;23        (B) not less than 9 years and not more than 40 years 24    with respect to: (i) 100 grams or more but less than 400 25    grams of a substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), 26    (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or   SB1569- 7 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1    (26) of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 2    derivative thereof, or (ii) 200 or more pills, tablets, 3    caplets, capsules, or objects but less than 600 pills, 4    tablets, caplets, capsules, or objects containing in them 5    or having upon them any amount of any substance listed in 6    paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 7    (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of Section 8    204, or an analog or derivative thereof;9        (C) not less than 12 years and not more than 50 years 10    with respect to: (i) 400 grams or more but less than 900 11    grams of a substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), 12    (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or 13    (26) of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 14    derivative thereof, or (ii) 600 or more pills, tablets, 15    caplets, capsules, or objects but less than 1,500 pills, 16    tablets, caplets, capsules, or objects containing in them 17    or having upon them any amount of any substance listed in 18    paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 19    (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of Section 20    204, or an analog or derivative thereof;21        (D) not less than 15 years and not more than 60 years 22    with respect to: (i) 900 grams or more of any substance 23    listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), 24    (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) 25    of Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof, or 26    (ii) 1,500 or more pills, tablets, caplets, capsules, or   SB1569- 8 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1    objects containing in them or having upon them any amount 2    of a substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), 3    (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of 4    subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or derivative 5    thereof;6        (8) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 7    pentazocine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 8    isomers of pentazocine, or an analog thereof;9        (9) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 10    methaqualone or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 11    isomers of methaqualone, or an analog thereof;12        (10) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 13    phencyclidine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 14    isomers of phencyclidine (PCP), or an analog thereof;15        (10.5) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 16    ketamine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of isomers 17    of ketamine, or an analog thereof;18        (10.6) 100 grams or more of any substance containing 19    hydrocodone, or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 20    isomers of hydrocodone, or an analog thereof;21        (10.7) (blank);22        (10.8) 100 grams or more of any substance containing 23    dihydrocodeine, or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 24    isomers of dihydrocodeine, or an analog thereof;25        (10.9) 100 grams or more of any substance containing 26    oxycodone, or any of the salts, isomers and salts of   SB1569- 9 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1    isomers of oxycodone, or an analog thereof;2        (11) 200 grams or more of any substance containing any 3    other controlled substance classified in Schedules I or 4    II, or an analog thereof, which is not otherwise included 5    in this subsection.6    (b) Any person sentenced with respect to violations of 7paragraph (1), (2), (3), (7), or (7.5) of subsection (a) 8involving 100 grams or more of the controlled substance named 9therein, may in addition to the penalties provided therein, be 10fined an amount not more than $500,000 or the full street value 11of the controlled or counterfeit substance or controlled 12substance analog, whichever is greater. The term "street 13value" shall have the meaning ascribed in Section 110-5 of the 14Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. Any person sentenced with 15respect to any other provision of subsection (a), may in 16addition to the penalties provided therein, be fined an amount 17not to exceed $500,000.18    (b-1) Excluding violations of this Act when the controlled 19substance is fentanyl, any person sentenced to a term of 20imprisonment with respect to violations of Section 401, 401.1, 21405, 405.1, 405.2, or 407, when the substance containing the 22controlled substance contains any amount of fentanyl, 5 3 23years shall be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the 24court, and the maximum sentence for the offense shall be 25increased by 5 3 years.26    (c) Any person who violates this Section with regard to   SB1569- 10 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1the following amounts of controlled or counterfeit substances 2or controlled substance analogs, notwithstanding any of the 3provisions of subsections (a), (b), (d), (e), (f), (g) or (h) 4to the contrary, is guilty of a Class 1 felony. The fine for 5violation of this subsection (c) shall not be more than 6$250,000:7        (1) 1 gram or more but less than 15 grams of any 8    substance containing heroin, or an analog thereof;9        (1.5) 1 gram or more but less than 15 grams of any 10    substance containing fentanyl, or an analog thereof;11        (2) 1 gram or more but less than 15 grams of any 12    substance containing cocaine, or an analog thereof;13        (3) 10 grams or more but less than 15 grams of any 14    substance containing morphine, or an analog thereof;15        (4) 50 grams or more but less than 200 grams of any 16    substance containing peyote, or an analog thereof;17        (5) 50 grams or more but less than 200 grams of any 18    substance containing a derivative of barbituric acid or 19    any of the salts of a derivative of barbituric acid, or an 20    analog thereof;21        (6) 50 grams or more but less than 200 grams of any 22    substance containing amphetamine or any salt of an optical 23    isomer of amphetamine, or an analog thereof;24        (6.5) (blank);25        (7)(i) 5 grams or more but less than 15 grams of any 26    substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or   SB1569- 11 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1    an analog thereof, or (ii) more than 10 objects or more 2    than 10 segregated parts of an object or objects but less 3    than 15 objects or less than 15 segregated parts of an 4    object containing in them or having upon them any amount 5    of any substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 6    (LSD), or an analog thereof;7        (7.5)(i) 5 grams or more but less than 15 grams of any 8    substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), 9    (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of 10    subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or derivative 11    thereof, or (ii) more than 10 pills, tablets, caplets, 12    capsules, or objects but less than 15 pills, tablets, 13    caplets, capsules, or objects containing in them or having 14    upon them any amount of any substance listed in paragraph 15    (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), 16    (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an 17    analog or derivative thereof;18        (8) 10 grams or more but less than 30 grams of any 19    substance containing pentazocine or any of the salts, 20    isomers and salts of isomers of pentazocine, or an analog 21    thereof;22        (9) 10 grams or more but less than 30 grams of any 23    substance containing methaqualone or any of the salts, 24    isomers and salts of isomers of methaqualone, or an analog 25    thereof;26        (10) 10 grams or more but less than 30 grams of any   SB1569- 12 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1    substance containing phencyclidine or any of the salts, 2    isomers and salts of isomers of phencyclidine (PCP), or an 3    analog thereof;4        (10.5) 10 grams or more but less than 30 grams of any 5    substance containing ketamine or any of the salts, isomers 6    and salts of isomers of ketamine, or an analog thereof;7        (10.6) 50 grams or more but less than 100 grams of any 8    substance containing hydrocodone, or any of the salts, 9    isomers and salts of isomers of hydrocodone, or an analog 10    thereof;11        (10.7) (blank);12        (10.8) 50 grams or more but less than 100 grams of any 13    substance containing dihydrocodeine, or any of the salts, 14    isomers and salts of isomers of dihydrocodeine, or an 15    analog thereof;16        (10.9) 50 grams or more but less than 100 grams of any 17    substance containing oxycodone, or any of the salts, 18    isomers and salts of isomers of oxycodone, or an analog 19    thereof;20        (11) 50 grams or more but less than 200 grams of any 21    substance containing a substance classified in Schedules I 22    or II, or an analog thereof, which is not otherwise 23    included in this subsection.24    (c-5) (Blank).25    (d) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 26any other amount of a controlled or counterfeit substance   SB1569- 13 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1containing dihydrocodeine or classified in Schedules I or II, 2or an analog thereof, which is (i) a narcotic drug, (ii) 3lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD) or an analog thereof, (iii) 4any substance containing amphetamine or fentanyl or any salt 5or optical isomer of amphetamine or fentanyl, or an analog 6thereof, or (iv) any substance containing N-Benzylpiperazine 7(BZP) or any salt or optical isomer of N-Benzylpiperazine 8(BZP), or an analog thereof, is guilty of a Class 2 felony. The 9fine for violation of this subsection (d) shall not be more 10than $200,000.11    (d-5) (Blank).12    (e) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 13any other amount of a controlled substance other than 14methamphetamine or counterfeit substance classified in 15Schedule I or II, or an analog thereof, which substance is not 16included under subsection (d) of this Section, is guilty of a 17Class 3 felony. The fine for violation of this subsection (e) 18shall not be more than $150,000.19    (f) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 20any other amount of a controlled or counterfeit substance 21classified in Schedule III is guilty of a Class 3 felony. The 22fine for violation of this subsection (f) shall not be more 23than $125,000.24    (g) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 25any other amount of a controlled or counterfeit substance 26classified in Schedule IV is guilty of a Class 3 felony. The   SB1569- 14 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1fine for violation of this subsection (g) shall not be more 2than $100,000.3    (h) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 4any other amount of a controlled or counterfeit substance 5classified in Schedule V is guilty of a Class 3 felony. The 6fine for violation of this subsection (h) shall not be more 7than $75,000.8    (i) This Section does not apply to the manufacture, 9possession or distribution of a substance in conformance with 10the provisions of an approved new drug application or an 11exemption for investigational use within the meaning of 12Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.13    (j) (Blank).14(Source: P.A. 99-371, eff. 1-1-16; 99-585, eff. 1-1-17; 15100-368, eff. 1-1-18.) 16    (720 ILCS 570/402)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1402)17    Sec. 402. Except as otherwise authorized by this Act, it 18is unlawful for any person knowingly to possess a controlled 19or counterfeit substance or controlled substance analog. A 20violation of this Act with respect to each of the controlled 21substances listed herein constitutes a single and separate 22violation of this Act. For purposes of this Section, 23"controlled substance analog" or "analog" means a substance, 24other than a controlled substance, which is not approved by 25the United States Food and Drug Administration or, if   SB1569- 15 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1approved, is not dispensed or possessed in accordance with 2State or federal law, and that has a chemical structure 3substantially similar to that of a controlled substance in 4Schedule I or II, or that was specifically designed to produce 5an effect substantially similar to that of a controlled 6substance in Schedule I or II. Examples of chemical classes in 7which controlled substance analogs are found include, but are 8not limited to, the following: phenethylamines, N-substituted 9piperidines, morphinans, ecgonines, quinazolinones, 10substituted indoles, and arylcycloalkylamines. For purposes of 11this Act, a controlled substance analog shall be treated in 12the same manner as the controlled substance to which it is 13substantially similar. 14    (a) Any person who violates this Section with respect to 15the following controlled or counterfeit substances and 16amounts, notwithstanding any of the provisions of subsections 17(c) and (d) to the contrary, is guilty of a Class 1 felony and 18shall, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, be sentenced as 19provided in this subsection (a) and fined as provided in 20subsection (b):21        (1) (A) not less than 4 years and not more than 15 22        years with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 23        100 grams of a substance containing heroin;24            (B) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 25        years with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 26        400 grams of a substance containing heroin;  SB1569- 16 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1            (C) not less than 8 years and not more than 40 2        years with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 3        900 grams of any substance containing heroin;4            (D) not less than 10 years and not more than 50 5        years with respect to 900 grams or more of any 6        substance containing heroin;7        (2) (A) not less than 4 years and not more than 15 8        years with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 9        100 grams of any substance containing cocaine;10            (B) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 11        years with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 12        400 grams of any substance containing cocaine;13            (C) not less than 8 years and not more than 40 14        years with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 15        900 grams of any substance containing cocaine;16            (D) not less than 10 years and not more than 50 17        years with respect to 900 grams or more of any 18        substance containing cocaine;19        (3) (A) not less than 4 years and not more than 15 20        years with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 21        100 grams of any substance containing morphine;22            (B) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 23        years with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 24        400 grams of any substance containing morphine;25            (C) not less than 6 years and not more than 40 26        years with respect to 400 grams or more but less than   SB1569- 17 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1        900 grams of any substance containing morphine;2            (D) not less than 10 years and not more than 50 3        years with respect to 900 grams or more of any 4        substance containing morphine;5        (4) 200 grams or more of any substance containing 6    peyote;7        (5) 200 grams or more of any substance containing a 8    derivative of barbituric acid or any of the salts of a 9    derivative of barbituric acid;10        (6) 200 grams or more of any substance containing 11    amphetamine or any salt of an optical isomer of 12    amphetamine;13        (6.5) (blank);14        (7) (A) not less than 4 years and not more than 15 15        years with respect to: (i) 15 grams or more but less 16        than 100 grams of any substance containing lysergic 17        acid diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 18        15 or more objects or 15 or more segregated parts of an 19        object or objects but less than 200 objects or 200 20        segregated parts of an object or objects containing in 21        them or having upon them any amount of any substance 22        containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or an 23        analog thereof;24            (B) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 25        years with respect to: (i) 100 grams or more but less 26        than 400 grams of any substance containing lysergic   SB1569- 18 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1        acid diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 2        200 or more objects or 200 or more segregated parts of 3        an object or objects but less than 600 objects or less 4        than 600 segregated parts of an object or objects 5        containing in them or having upon them any amount of 6        any substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 7        (LSD), or an analog thereof;8            (C) not less than 8 years and not more than 40 9        years with respect to: (i) 400 grams or more but less 10        than 900 grams of any substance containing lysergic 11        acid diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 12        600 or more objects or 600 or more segregated parts of 13        an object or objects but less than 1500 objects or 1500 14        segregated parts of an object or objects containing in 15        them or having upon them any amount of any substance 16        containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or an 17        analog thereof;18            (D) not less than 10 years and not more than 50 19        years with respect to: (i) 900 grams or more of any 20        substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), 21        or an analog thereof, or (ii) 1500 or more objects or 22        1500 or more segregated parts of an object or objects 23        containing in them or having upon them any amount of a 24        substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), 25        or an analog thereof;26        (7.5) (A) not less than 4 years and not more than 15   SB1569- 19 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1        years with respect to: (i) 15 grams or more but less 2        than 100 grams of any substance listed in paragraph 3        (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 4        (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of 5        Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof, or 6        (ii) 15 or more pills, tablets, caplets, capsules, or 7        objects but less than 200 pills, tablets, caplets, 8        capsules, or objects containing in them or having upon 9        them any amount of any substance listed in paragraph 10        (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 11        (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of 12        Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof;13            (B) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 14        years with respect to: (i) 100 grams or more but less 15        than 400 grams of any substance listed in paragraph 16        (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 17        (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of 18        Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof, or 19        (ii) 200 or more pills, tablets, caplets, capsules, or 20        objects but less than 600 pills, tablets, caplets, 21        capsules, or objects containing in them or having upon 22        them any amount of any substance listed in paragraph 23        (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 24        (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of 25        Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof;26            (C) not less than 8 years and not more than 40   SB1569- 20 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1        years with respect to: (i) 400 grams or more but less 2        than 900 grams of any substance listed in paragraph 3        (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 4        (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of 5        Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof, or 6        (ii) 600 or more pills, tablets, caplets, capsules, or 7        objects but less than 1,500 pills, tablets, caplets, 8        capsules, or objects containing in them or having upon 9        them any amount of any substance listed in paragraph 10        (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 11        (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of 12        Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof;13            (D) not less than 10 years and not more than 50 14        years with respect to: (i) 900 grams or more of any 15        substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), 16        (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) 17        of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 18        derivative thereof, or (ii) 1,500 or more pills, 19        tablets, caplets, capsules, or objects containing in 20        them or having upon them any amount of a substance 21        listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), 22        (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of 23        subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 24        derivative thereof;25        (8) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 26    pentazocine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of   SB1569- 21 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1    isomers of pentazocine, or an analog thereof;2        (9) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 3    methaqualone or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 4    isomers of methaqualone;5        (10) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 6    phencyclidine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 7    isomers of phencyclidine (PCP);8        (10.5) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 9    ketamine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of isomers 10    of ketamine;11        (11) 200 grams or more of any substance containing any 12    substance classified as a narcotic drug in Schedules I or 13    II, or an analog thereof, which is not otherwise included 14    in this subsection.15    (b) Any person sentenced with respect to violations of 16paragraph (1), (2), (3), (7), or (7.5) of subsection (a) 17involving 100 grams or more of the controlled substance named 18therein, may in addition to the penalties provided therein, be 19fined an amount not to exceed $200,000 or the full street value 20of the controlled or counterfeit substances, whichever is 21greater. The term "street value" shall have the meaning 22ascribed in Section 110-5 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 231963. Any person sentenced with respect to any other provision 24of subsection (a), may in addition to the penalties provided 25therein, be fined an amount not to exceed $200,000.26    (b-1) Excluding violations of this Act when the controlled   SB1569- 22 -LRB104 05006 RLC 15034 b1substance is fentanyl, for any person sentenced to a term of 2imprisonment with respect to violations of Section 402, when 3the substance containing the controlled substance contains any 4amount of fentanyl, 3 years shall be added to the term of 5imprisonment imposed by the court, and the maximum sentence 6for the offense shall be increased by 3 years. 7    (c) Any person who violates this Section with regard to an 8amount of a controlled substance other than methamphetamine or 9counterfeit substance not set forth in subsection (a) or (d) 10is guilty of a Class 4 felony. The fine for a violation 11punishable under this subsection (c) shall not be more than 12$25,000.13    (d) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 14any amount of anabolic steroid is guilty of a Class C 15misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class B misdemeanor 16for a subsequent offense committed within 2 years of a prior 17conviction.18(Source: P.A. 99-371, eff. 1-1-16; 100-368, eff. 1-1-18.)